Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 5, chapter 96, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) [ The Oregon Health Authority ] A public body, as defined in ORS 174.109 , a com-
munity mental health program, a licensed medical provider or other certified or  licensed practi-
tioner, an education provider or a coordinated care  organization may not deny any individual [ under
the age of 21 years ] access to mental health assessment, treatment or services on the basis  that the
individual also has an intellectual or developmental disability.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority, the Department  of Human Services, the Department of Edu-
cation, the Oregon  Medical Board and other health licensing agencies that license or certify mental
or behavioral health providers shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
[(3)(a)] (3) As used in this section, “education provider” means:
[(A)] (a) A school district, as defined in ORS 332.002;
[(B)] (b) The Oregon School for the Deaf;
[(C)] (c) An educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program;
[(D)] (d) A public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005;
[(E)] (e) An education service district, as defined in ORS 334.003;
[(F)] (f) An approved recovery school, as defined in ORS 336.680; or
[(G)] (g) Any state-operated program that provides educational services to students.
[(b) “Education provider” does not include: ]
[(A) The Oregon Youth Authority; ]
[(B) The Department of Corrections; or ]
[(C) The Department of Education, except when functioning as an  education provider on behalf of
the Oregon School for the Deaf. ]
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled Senate Bill 729 (SB 729-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 729 (SB 729-INTRO) Page 2